Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325M.40] BIOMETRIC DATA; CONSENT; SAFEGUARDS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Biometric data defined. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "biometric data" means an image, description, or recording of a face, facial features, a retina, an iris, a fingerprint, a voiceprint, hand geometry, or face geometry that may be used, singly or in combination with each other or other information, to identify an individual. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Consent required. new text end new text begin A person is prohibited from collecting biometric data from an individual unless the person receives the individual's consent to collect the biometric data before the collection occurs. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Prohibitions; safeguards; retention. new text end new text begin A person who obtains biometric data: new text end new text begin (1) must not sell, lease, or otherwise disclose the biometric data to another person unless: new text end new text begin (i) the individual consents to the disclosure for identification purposes in the event of the individual's disappearance or death; new text end new text begin (ii) the disclosure completes a financial transaction that the individual requested or authorized; new text end new text begin (iii) the disclosure is required or permitted by a federal or state law; or new text end new text begin (iv) the disclosure is made by or to a law enforcement agency for a law enforcement purpose in response to a warrant; new text end new text begin (2) must store, transmit, and protect from disclosure the biometric data using reasonable care and in a manner that is at least as or more protective than the manner in which the person stores, transmits, and protects other confidential information the person possesses; and new text end new text begin (3) must delete and destroy the biometric data within a reasonable time, but no later than one year from the date the purpose for collecting the data expires, unless the data is maintained pursuant to a federal or state law that requires a longer retention period, in which case the biometric data must be destroyed within a reasonable time frame but no later than one year from the date that the state or federal law retention period expires. If an employer collects an employee's biometric data for security purposes, the purpose for collecting the data expires upon termination of the employment relationship. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin A person who violates this section is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 for each violation. The attorney general may bring an action to recover the civil penalty. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Exemptions. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to voiceprint data retained by a financial institution or an affiliate of a financial institution, as those terms are defined by United States Code, title 15, section 6809. new text end